Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.262

Theft of telecommunication services.

(1) A person is guilty of theft of telecommunication services if he or she knowingly and with intent to avoid payment:

(a) Uses a telecommunication device to obtain telecommunication services without having entered into a prior agreement with a telecommunication service provider to pay for the telecommunication services; or

(b) Possesses a telecommunication device.

(2) Theft of telecommunication services is a class C felony.

[ 1995 c 92 s 6.]

NOTES:

Telecommunications crime: Chapter 9.26A RCW.